v11.dix
<pardef n="A/yu_v">
        <e><p>
                <l>yxanu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxalYu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ywukoVMdiwu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxavu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxaru</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxeV</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxiri</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxeVnu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yxeVvu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxAneV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxAlYeV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixeV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwiveV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxAreV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxIya</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxIri</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxeneV</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwiruveVnu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwixxeveV</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwiruveVvu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuxxAneV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuxxAlYeV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwaxeV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwaveV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwAreV</l>
				<r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwIya</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwwIri</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuviri</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwweneV</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
				<l>yuveVnu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuwweveV</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yuveVvu</l>
                <r>yu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Ayu"><i>A</i><par n="A/yu_v"/></e>
<e lm="Iyu"><i>I</i><par n="A/yu_v"/></e>
